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DI3R9-01

DTC P 1790/65ST Solenoid Valve Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

STsolenoidvalveis switchedON  -OFF by asignalfrom Engineand ECT ECU (2UZ -FE, 1FZ-FE) orECT
ECU ( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE) sothatletin or outtiming of 2nd brake is adjusted by operating orifice control

valve. Therefore, ST solenoid operates when let in or out 2nd brake.

If it is broken, the shift shock becomes big.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

ECU memorizes DTC 65 if above (a) or (b) condition is de-
tected once or more, but ECU does not start O/D OFF indica-
tor light blinking.

P1790/65 (a) Solenoidresistanceis30  Q orlower (shortcircuit) when
solenoid energized.

(b) Solenoidresistanceis 100k Q2 or higher (open circuit) when
solenoid is not energized.

* Openorshortin ST solenoid valve circuit

* ST solenoidvalve
*EngineandECTECU (2UZ -FE, 1FZ-FE)
*ECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE)
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Measure resistance between terminal ST of Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU
and body ground.
2UZ - FE PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO-127).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU or

ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal ST of Engine and ECT
ECU or ECT ECU and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 -15Q at 20 °C (68 °F)
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OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU (See page IN-35).
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2 [ Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU and
automatic transmission solenoid connector.

PREPARATION:
2UZ-FE Disconnect the solenoid connector from the automatic trans-
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Check the harness and connector between terminal ST of En-
gine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU and terminal ST of solenoid
connector.
OK:

Thereis noopenand no shortcircuit.
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E

Repair or replace the harness or connector.

o )

3 Check ST solenoid valve.

D03256

E

Electrical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.
(d) Remove the ST solenoid valve.

CHECK:
(a) Measure resistance between solenoid connector and
body ground.

(b) Connect positive @ lead to terminal of solenoid connec-
tor, negative © lead to solenoid body.

OK:
(a) Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20 °C (68 °F)
(b) The solenoid makes an operating noise.

Mechanical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

(d) Remove the ST solenoid valve.

CHECK:

(@) Applying 490 kPa (5 kgf/lcm?2, 71 psi) of compressed air,
check that the solenoid valves do not leak air.

(b)  When battery positive voltage is supplied to the shift sole-
noid valves, check that the solenoid valves open.

OK:
(a) Solenoid valve does not leak air.
(b) Solenoid valve opens.

o)

Replace the solenoid valve.

Repair or replace the solenoid wire.
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